Washington statutes.
RCW 43.280.080

Office of crime victims advocacy.

The office of crime victims advocacy is established in the department of commerce. The office shall assist communities in planning and implementing services for crime victims, advocate on behalf of crime victims in obtaining needed services and resources, and advise local and state governments on practices, policies, and priorities that impact crime victims. In addition, the office shall administer grant programs for services to victims of crime and prevention activities as authorized by state or federal legislation, budget, or executive order. The department shall seek, receive, and make use of any funds which may be available from federal or other sources to augment state funds appropriated for the purpose of this section, and shall make every effort to qualify for federal funding.

[ 2012 c 29 s 7; 1995 c 241 s 1.]

NOTES:

Office designated as the single point of contact in state government regarding the trafficking of persons: RCW 7.68.370.